California statutes. Financial Code
 shall this section be construed to require the changing of any investments heretofore lawfully made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1323.

Any director, officer, or employee of a bank or of a foreign banking corporation who asks for or receives, or consents or agrees to receive, any commission, emolument, or gratuity or any money, property, or thing of value for his own personal benefit or of personal advantage for procuring or endeavoring to procure for any person any loan from such bank, or the purchase or discount of any note, draft, check, bill of exchange, or other obligation by such bank, or for permitting any person
 to overdraw any account with such bank, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1324.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of any bank who knowingly receives or possesses himself or herself of any of its property otherwise than in payment of a just demand, and with intent to defraud, omits to make or cause to be made a full and true entry thereof in its books and accounts or concurs in omitting to make any material entry thereof is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1325.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of a bank who knowingly concurs in making or publishing any written report, exhibit, or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition containing any material statement which is false, or having the custody of its books willfully refuses or neglects to make any proper entry in such books as required by law, or to exhibit or allow the same to be inspected or extracts to be taken therefrom by the commissioner or his or her deputies or examiners,
 is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1326.

No bank shall publish a statement of its resources or liabilities in connection with those of any other bank, unless such statement shall show the resources and liabilities of each bank separately.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1327.

(a) Any person who willfully and knowingly makes, circulates, or transmits to another or others, any statement or rumor, written, printed, or by word of mouth, which is untrue in fact and is directly or by inference derogatory to the financial condition or affects the solvency or financial standing of any bank doing business in this state, or who knowingly counsels, aids, procures, or induces another to start, transmit, or circulate any such statement or rumor, is
 guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

(b) The provisions of Section 329 shall not apply to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1328.

(a) A bank or trust company may engage in the business of renting safe deposit boxes and may receive personal property for safekeeping and storage on its banking premises.

(b) A copy of any safe deposit rental agreement, or personal property safekeeping and storage agreement, which is prepared by the bank or trust company and signed by the customer shall be delivered to the customer at the time the
 agreement is signed if the agreement is signed at a place of business of the bank or trust company. If the agreement is not signed at a place of business of the bank or trust company, the bank or trust company shall mail or deliver a copy of the agreement to the customer within 10 calendar days after the bank or trust company receives it. The contract shall not contain any blank spaces to be filled in after the customer signs the contract. If more than one customer has signed the agreement, the bank or trust company may comply with this section by mailing or delivering the copy to any one of the customers who reside at the same address. A copy shall also be mailed or delivered to any other customer who has signed the agreement and who does not reside at the same address. As used in this section, “copy” means a reproduction, facsimile, or duplicate. A bank or trust company which fails to comply with this section is liable to its customer for any actual damages suffered by the customer as a result of that
 failure. The remedy provided by this section is nonexclusive and is in addition to any remedies or penalties available under other laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1329.

(a) In this section, “subject person,” when used with respect to a bank, means any director or officer of the bank, any controlling person of the bank, or any director or officer of a controlling person of the bank. For purposes of this subdivision, “controlling person” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 1250.

(b) No bank shall purchase any real or personal property or any interest
 in real or personal property, including, but not limited to, a leasehold, or any contract arising from the sale of real or personal property or any note or bond in which any subject person of such bank is personally or financially interested, directly or indirectly, for such person’s own account, for such person, or as the partner or agent of others, without the prior approval by the board of directors of the bank and for not more than the current market value of the property purchased.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1330.

(a) In this section, “subject person” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 1329.

(b) No subject person of a bank shall purchase, directly or indirectly, or be interested in the purchase of, any of the bank’s obligations or assets without the prior approval of the board of the directors of the bank and for an amount less than the then current market value. Every person violating this
 section shall be liable to the people of this state, for each offense, for twice the market value of the assets so purchased.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1331.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Carrying a security” means maintaining, reducing, or retiring indebtedness originally incurred to acquire a security.

(2) “Controlling person” has the same meaning specified in Section 1250.

(3) “Security” has the following meanings:

(A) When used with respect to a bank, “security” has the same meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 1200.

(B) When
 used with respect to any other person, “security” has the same meaning set forth in Section 25019 of the Corporations Code.

(b) No bank shall acquire, hold, extend credit on the security of, or extend credit for the purpose of acquiring or carrying, any security of the bank or of any controlling person of the bank.

(c) (1) Any bank which acquires or holds securities in violation of this section shall be liable to the people of this state for twice the market, book, or face value of the securities, whichever is greatest.

(2) Any bank which extends credit in violation of this section shall be liable to the people of this state for twice the amount of the credit so extended.

(d) This section does not apply to any of the following transactions:

(1) Any acquisition or extension of credit by a bank which is necessary to reduce or prevent loss to the bank on debts previously contracted in good faith.

(2) Any redemption by a bank of any of its redeemable securities in accordance with applicable provisions of this division and of Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(3) Any acquisition by a bank of any of its securities, other than an acquisition of the type described in paragraph (1) or (2), if the acquisition is approved in advance by the commissioner.

(e) The provisions of Section 329 shall not apply to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 36.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1332.

Any officer, director, trustee, employee, or agent of any bank in this state, who abstracts or willfully misapplies any of the money, funds, or property of the bank, or willfully misapplies its credit, is guilty of a felony. Upon conviction, the court shall, in addition to any other punishment imposed, order the person to make full restitution to the bank. Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to repeal, amend or impair any existing provision of law prescribing a
 punishment for such an offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1333.

(a) Every director of a bank in this state who does either of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) In case of the fraudulent insolvency of such bank, the director participated in the fraud.

(2) Willfully does any act as the director that is expressly forbidden by law or willfully omits to perform any duty imposed by law upon him
 or her as the director.

(b) The insolvency of a bank is deemed fraudulent for the purposes of this section, unless its affairs appear upon investigation to have been administered clearly, legally, and with the same care and diligence that agents receiving a compensation for their services are bound, by law, to observe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.

An officer or agent of any bank in this state, who makes or delivers any guaranty or endorsement on behalf of such bank, whereby it may become liable upon any of its discounted notes, bills or obligations, in a sum beyond the amount of loans and discounts which such bank may legally make, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1335.

A director of a bank, organized under the laws of this state, who concurs in any vote or act of the directors of such corporation, or any of them, by which it is intended to make a loan or discount to any director of such corporation, or upon paper upon which any such director is liable or responsible to an amount exceeding the amount allowed by the statutes is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1336.

Any director, trustee, officer, or employee of any bank organized under the laws of this state, who makes or maintains, or attempts to make or maintain, a deposit of such bank’s funds with any other corporation on condition, or with the understanding, express or implied, that the corporation receiving such deposit make a loan or advance, directly or indirectly, to any director, trustee, officer, or employee of the corporation so making or maintaining or attempting to make or maintain
 such deposit is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1337.

Any officer or employee of any bank organized under the laws of this state, who intentionally conceals from the directors of the bank any discounts or loans made by it between the regular meetings of its board, or the purchase of any securities or the sale of its securities during that period, or knowingly fails to report to the board when required to do so by law, all discounts or loans made by it and all securities purchased or sold by it between the regular meetings of its board, is
 guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1338.

Every officer, agent, teller, or clerk of any bank, and every individual banker, or agent, teller, or clerk of any individual banker, who receives any deposits, knowing that the bank, association, or banker is insolvent, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1339.

Any officer, director, trustee, employee, or agent of any bank, who willfully makes a false or untrue entry in any book or record or in any report, tag, or statement of the business, affairs, or condition or in connection with any transaction of the bank, with intent to deceive any officer, director or trustee thereof, or any agent or examiner, private or official, employed or lawfully appointed to examine into its condition or into any of its affairs or transactions, or any public
 officer, office, or board to which the bank is required by law to report, or which has authority by law to examine into its affairs or transactions, or into any of its affairs or transactions, or who, with like intent, willfully omits to make a new entry of any matter particularly pertaining to the business, property, condition, affairs, transactions, assets, or accounts of the bank in any book, record, report, statement, or tag of the bank, or who with like intent alters, abstracts, conceals, or destroys any book, record, report, statement, or tag of the bank made, written, or kept, or required to be made, written, or kept by him or her or under his or her direction, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1340.

Unless specifically authorized by law or by the commissioner, a bank shall not become, act as, or in any other manner assume the duties or liabilities of, a general partner. For purposes of this section, “general partner” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (m) of Section 15901.02 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1341.

A bank, or the agent of a bank, that has received a notice pursuant to Section 7507.6 of the Business and Professions Code, shall not make a subsequent assignment to skip trace, locate, or repossess a vehicle without simultaneously, and in the same manner by which the assignment is given, advising the assignee of the assignment of the information contained in the notice. As used in this section, “assignment” has the same meaning set forth in Section 7500.1 of the Business and Professions
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Loans to Insiders [1360. - 1367.]

1360.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this article, insofar as they are contained in Regulation O (12 C.F.R. Part 215) of the Federal Reserve Board, conform, and be interpreted by anyone construing the provisions of this article to so conform, to Regulation O, to any rule or interpretation promulgated thereunder by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, and to any interpretation issued by an official or employee of the Federal Reserve System duly
 authorized to issue the interpretation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1361.

As used in this article:

(a) “Bank” means:

(1) Any commercial bank, industrial bank, or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state.

(2) Any foreign (other nation) bank that is licensed by the commissioner under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 20 to maintain a
 depositary agency or branch office, as defined in Section 1750, in this state, with respect to any office of that type.

(3) Any corporation incorporated under the laws of this state that is incorporated for the purpose of engaging in, or that is authorized by the commissioner to engage in, business under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 21.

(4) Any foreign corporation that is licensed by the commissioner under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 21 to maintain an office in this state and to transact at the office business under that article, with respect to any office of that type.

(5) When used to designate a person that extends credit, any subsidiary of a bank, as defined in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4).

(b) “Company” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 215.2 of Regulation O.

(c) “Executive officer” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 215.2 of Regulation O. Also, “executive officer,” when used with respect to any bank of the type described in paragraph (2) or (4) of subdivision (a), includes the manager of each office of the type referred to in paragraph (2) or (4) of subdivision (a) that the bank maintains in this state.

(d) “Extension of credit” has the meaning set forth in Section 215.3 of Regulation O. However, for purposes of this subdivision, the term “member bank,” as used in Section 215.3, means a bank.

(e) “Regulation O” means Regulation O (Part 215 (commencing with Section 215.1) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations) of the
 Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.

(f) “Subsidiary” has the meaning set forth in Section 1841(d) of Title 12 of the United States Code. However, for purposes of this subdivision, the term “bank holding company,” as used in Section 1841(d) of Title 12 of the United States Code, means a bank holding company, as defined in Section 1841(a) of Title 12 of the United States Code, or a bank, and the term “board,” as used in Section 1841(d) of Title 12 of the United States Code, means the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1362.

Sections 215.2, 215.3, 215.4, 215.5, 215.8, and 215.9 of Regulation O in all of their particulars, including footnotes, are hereby referred to, incorporated by reference into this article, and adopted, subject to the following:

(a) The term “this Subpart,” as used in the referenced sections of Regulation O, means this article.

(b) Subdivision (j) of Section
 215.2 of Regulation O is not applicable. Instead, the term “member bank,” as used in the referenced sections of Regulation O, means a bank.

(c) The term “executive officer,” as used in the referenced sections of Regulation O, includes, in the case of a bank of the type described in paragraph (2) or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1361, the manager of each office of the type referred to in paragraph (2) or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1361 that the bank maintains in this state.

(d) The definition of “lending limit” in subdivision (i) of Section 215.2 of Regulation O is not applicable; instead, the term “lending limit,” as used in the referenced sections of Regulation O, means an amount equal to the limit on obligations of a single obligor set forth in Section 1481, and any reference in the referenced sections of Regulation O to the lending limit specified in subdivision (i)
 of Section 215.2 is considered to be a reference to the limit specified in Section 1481.

(e) (1) Any company which is majority owned by one or more executive officers or directors of a bank, individually or collectively, is deemed to be a related interest of each of those executive officers or directors for purposes of the referenced sections of Regulation O.

(2) In case an individual who is an executive officer of a bank is also a director or executive officer of a company, the company is deemed to be a related interest of the individual for purposes of the referenced sections of Regulation O except subdivision (c) of Section 215.4. However, this paragraph shall not apply to an extension of credit by a bank to any of the following companies:

(A) A bank holding company of which the bank is a
 subsidiary.

(B) Any subsidiary of the bank holding company.

(C) Any nonprofit company engaged in religious, charitable, educational, scientific, literary, social, or recreational purposes, provided that the individual whose position as a director or executive officer of the company at issue does not receive compensation in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per year for serving as a director or executive officer of the company.

(3) In case a bank in making an extension of credit becomes subject to the requirements set forth in subdivision (b)(1)(i) of Section 215.4 of Regulation O because of paragraph (1) or (2), the bank shall be deemed to fulfill the requirement if the extension of credit is promptly reported to the board of the bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1363.

No bank shall extend credit in an aggregate amount greater than the amount permitted in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 215.5 of Regulation O to any company that is majority owned by one or more executive officers of the bank, individually or collectively. For purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 215.5 of Regulation O, the total amount of credit extended by the bank to the company is considered to be extended to each of those executive
 officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1364.

In making any extension of credit that is subject to this article, a bank shall comply with all other applicable provisions of this division relating to extensions of credit by banks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1365.

No provision of this article or of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1480) of Chapter 14 shall apply to an advance of money made by a bank pursuant to Section 317 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1366.

A bank may make a loan, otherwise complying with the provisions of this division, for the benefit of a trust, notwithstanding that the bank or any one or more executive officers or directors of the bank are trustees of the trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1367.

Any bank that makes an extension of credit in violation of this article is subject to a civil penalty pursuant to Section 329. Any person, other than the bank making the extension of credit, who knowingly makes or procures an extension of credit in violation of this article is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Agency Activities [1380. - 1397.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1380. - 1382.]

1380.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Authorized agency activities” means receiving deposits, renewing time deposits, closing loans, servicing loans, and receiving payments on loans and other obligations. “Authorized agency activities” includes ministerial functions such as providing loan applications, assembling documents, providing a location for returning documents necessary for making a loan,
 providing loan account information, receiving payments, disbursing loan funds, evaluating loan applications, and other activities that the commissioner may specify by order or regulation. However, “authorized agency activities” does not include any other activities that the commissioner may specify by order or regulation.

(b) “Insured depository institution” means any bank, savings and loan association, savings association, savings bank, or industrial loan company the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. “Insured depository institution” includes any depository institution affiliate within the meaning of Section 18(r) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1828(r)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1381.

This chapter does not apply to a California state bank having an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent or to a California state bank engaging in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution in any case other than a case where, but for the provisions of Sections 1389 and 1396, an office of the agent would for regulatory purposes be considered to be an office of the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1382.

(a) In this section, “affiliated,” when used with respect to a California state bank and an insured depository institution, means that the California state bank controls the insured depository institution, the insured depository institution controls the California state bank, or the California state bank and the insured depository institution are under common control, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries. For purposes of this subdivision,
 “control” has the meaning set forth in Section 1250.

(b) In case a California state bank and an insured depository institution are affiliated, the prior approval requirement set forth in Section 1384 or 1391 is deemed to be satisfied if the California state bank files a notice with the commissioner and, within 30 days or any longer period to which the California state bank consents, the commissioner either (1) issues a written statement not objecting to the notice or (2) does not issue a written objection to the notice.

(c) (1) A notice filed by a California state bank under subdivision (b) shall contain the following information:

(A) The name of the California state bank.

(B) The name and location of the main or head office of the
 affiliated insured depository institution.

(C) A description of the proposed agency, including identification of the institution that is to be the principal, identification of the institution that is to be the agent, and specification of the activities in which the agent is to engage on behalf of the principal.

(D) Any other information that the commissioner may require.

(2) A notice filed by a California state bank under subdivision (b) shall be in the form, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner requires by regulation or order, be verified in the manner that the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(3) A notice filed by a California state bank under subdivision (b) shall be accompanied by a filing fee of two hundred
 fifty dollars ($250).

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b), a notice by a California state bank is deemed to be filed with the commissioner at the time when the complete notice, including any amendments or supplements, containing all the information required by the commissioner, and otherwise complying with subdivision (c) is received by the commissioner.

(e) In determining whether or not to object to a notice by a California state bank, the commissioner shall consider the factors set forth in Section 1387 or 1394, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California State Bank as Principal [1384. - 1390.]

1384.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1070), a California state bank may, with the prior approval of the commissioner and subject to any regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, have an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1385.

An application by a California state bank for approval to have an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner so requires by regulation or order, be verified in the manner that the commissioner may, by regulation or order, require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1386.

An application by a California state bank for approval to have an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent shall be accompanied by a filing fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1387.

In determining whether to approve or deny an application by a California state bank for approval to have an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent, the commissioner shall consider both of the following:

(a) Whether the proposed agency arrangement is consistent with the safe and sound operation of the California state bank.

(b) Any other factors that the commissioner deems relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1388.

No California state bank may have an insured depository institution conduct as its agent any activity that the California state bank is prohibited from conducting itself.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1389.

No office of an insured depository institution that is performing authorized agency activities as agent for a California state bank in accordance with this article shall, on that account, be deemed to be an office of the California state bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1390.

If the commissioner finds that any activity performed by an insured depository institution as agent for a California state bank is not an authorized agency activity or that the agency arrangement is inconsistent with safe and sound banking practices, the commissioner may order the California state bank to terminate the agency arrangement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California State Bank as Agent [1391. - 1397.]

1391.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1070), a California state bank may, with the prior approval of the commissioner and subject to any regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, engage in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1392.

An application by a California state bank for approval to engage in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner so requires by regulation or order, be verified in the manner that the commissioner may, by regulation or order, require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1393.

An application by a California state bank for approval to engage in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution shall be accompanied by a filing fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1394.

In determining whether to approve or deny an application by a California state bank for approval to engage in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution, the commissioner shall consider both of the following factors:

(a) Whether the proposed agency arrangement is consistent with the safe and sound operation of the California state bank.

(b) Any other factors that the commissioner deems relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1395.

No California state bank may conduct any activity as an agent for an insured depository institution that the California state bank would be prohibited from conducting as a principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1396.

(a) No office of a California state bank that conducts authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution in accordance with this article shall, on that account, be deemed to be an office of the insured depository institution.

(b) For purposes of this division, no insured depository institution that has a California state bank engaged in authorized agency activities as its
 agent shall on that account be deemed to be transacting business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1397.

If the commissioner finds that any activities performed by a California state bank as agent for an insured depository institution are not authorized agency activities or that the agency arrangement is inconsistent with safe and sound banking practices, the commissioner may order the California state bank to terminate the agency arrangement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Deposits [1400. - 1440.]



  ARTICLE 1. Depositors [1400. - 1415.]

1400.

A bank account by or in the name of a minor shall be held for the exclusive right and benefit of such minor and shall be paid to such minor or to his order and payment so made is a valid release and discharge to the bank for such deposit or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.

A bank account by or in the name of a married person shall be held for the exclusive right and benefit of the person, shall be free from the control or lien of any other person except a creditor, and shall be paid to the person or to the order of the person, and payment so made is a valid and sufficient release and discharge to the bank for the deposit or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

A bank account that is a multiple-party account as defined in Section 5132 of the Probate Code is governed by Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1403.

No bank, directly or indirectly, by any device whatever, shall pay any interest on any demand deposit except to the extent that the payment of interest on demand deposits is permitted to member banks of the Federal Reserve System or to banks whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any successor federal agency insuring bank deposits. This section shall not apply to any deposit which is payable only at an office of the bank located outside of the states
 of the United States and the District of Columbia.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1404.

Notwithstanding Section 10145 of the Business and Professions Code or any other provision of law, but subject to the limitations of Section 854, benefits accruing from the placement in a noninterest bearing account of a financial institution of funds received by a real estate broker who collects payments or provides services in connection with a loan secured by a lien on real property under subdivision (d) of Section 10131 or Section 10131.1 of the Business and Professions Code shall
 inure to the broker, unless otherwise agreed in writing by the broker and the lender or note owner on the loan. A borrower shall receive at least 2 percent simple interest per annum on impound account payments covered by Section 2954.8 of the Civil Code. For purposes of this section “financial institution” means any institution the business of which is engaging in financial activities as described in Section 1843(k) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1405.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10145 of the Business and Professions Code or any other provision of law, benefits accruing from the placement in an interest bearing account of a financial institution of funds received by a real estate broker, as defined in Section 10131 of the Business and Professions Code, who collects payments or provides services for an institutional investor in connection with a loan secured by commercial real property may inure to the real estate
 broker, if agreed to in writing by the real estate broker and that institutional investor as to that loan.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Commercial real property” means real estate improved with other than a one-to-four family residence.

(2) “Financial institution” means any institution the business of which is engaging in financial activities as described in Section 1843(k) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(3) “Institutional investor” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 50003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1406.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Creditor” includes, but is not limited to, a depositor.

(2) “Insolvency,” when used with respect to a bank, means that the bank is unable to pay its debts as they come due.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any transaction authorized under Section 1463 or 1465.

(2) Any transaction made by a bank in the ordinary course of its business.

(c) No bank may pay or secure a creditor if the bank does so (1) after committing an act of insolvency or in contemplation of insolvency and (2) with a view to preventing the application of its assets in the manner prescribed in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 600) of Division 1 or with a view to the preference of one creditor to another.

(d) Any transaction made by a bank in violation of this section is void.
